arb-nouns-lexc.txt
^ss^مختبئ^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مختلف^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مخطط^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مخلف^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مدافع^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مدجج^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مرابط^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مرتبط^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مرحب^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مردد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مرعب^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مزود^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مزيف^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مستشهد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مستفيد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مستقر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مستند^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مسرع^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مسيطر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مشكك^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مشير^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مصر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مصمم^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مضر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مضرب^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معبر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معترف^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معتصم^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معتقد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معتمد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معدل^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معرب^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معرض^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معلق^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^معني^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مفرط^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مقبل^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مقتنع^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مقيم^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مكتفي^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مكرر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^ملمح^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^ملوح^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منافي^se^^remya^+masc		FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منتسب^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منتظم^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منتمي^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منحدر^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مندد^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منشق^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منطلق^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منظم^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منفتح^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^منوه^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^موافق^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^مواكب^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^موجه^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^ناطق^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^نافي^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^واقع^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^ss^واقف^se^+masc			FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;


LEXICON GuessWords
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		FemMascduFemduMascplFempl;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		FemMascduFemduFempl;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		FemMascduFemdu;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		MascduFempl;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		Mascdu;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		Fempl;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		FemduFempl;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		Femdu;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM^		NoNumber;

! =================START OF PLURAL SUFFIXES================================
! 1
! مثل قادر ومترجم
LEXICON FemMascduFemduMascplFempl
					CaseEnds;
					Fem;
					MascDual;
					FemDual;
					MascPlural;
					FemPlural;

! 2
! مثل جديد وكريم
LEXICON FemMascduFemduFempl
! There is a broken plural form for the masculine
					CaseEnds;
					Fem;
					MascDual;
					FemDual;
					FemPlural;


! 3
! مثل تعليمي ومفهرس
LEXICON FemMascduFemdu
! There is no plural
					CaseEnds;
					Fem;
					MascDual;
					FemDual;


! 4
! مثل امتحان ولقاء
LEXICON MascduFempl
					CaseEnds;
					MascDual;
					FemPlural;


! 5
! مثل كتاب ومسكن
LEXICON Mascdu
! There is a broken plural form
					CaseEnds;
					MascDual;

! 6
! مثل تصرف وبحوث
LEXICON Fempl
					CaseEnds;
					FemPlural;

! 7
! مثل أسرة ولحظة
LEXICON FemduFempl
					CaseEnds;
					FemDual;
					FemPlural;

! 8
LEXICON Femdu
! مثل امرأة ومسألة وغرفة
! There is a broken plural form
					CaseEnds;
					FemDual;

! 9
LEXICON NoNumber
! مثل معرفة وسيطرة وتمرد واستيطان
					CaseEnds;

LEXICON NoCompound
! مثل السبت والأحد
					WordEnd;

LEXICON IrregPlural
! مثل طلاب
+pl:0					CaseEndsPl;

! 12
! مثل طيار طياران وطيارون وغواص غواصان وغواصون
LEXICON MascduMascpl
					CaseEnds;
					MascDual;
					MascPlural;

! 13
! مثل المحافظون والعثمانيون والأمنيون
LEXICON Mascpl
					MascPlural;

! ================END OF PLURAL SUFFIXES======================
! with numbers only
LEXICON FemNum
+fem+sg:ة					WordEnd;
					IndefCaseEnds;
LEXICON Fem
+fem+sg:ة					PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON FemDual
+fem:ت					Dual;

LEXICON MascDual
					Dual;

LEXICON Dual
+dual+nom:ان+dual				MarkNom;
+dual+accgen:ين+dual				MarkGen;
+dual+nom+compound:ا+dual			MarkNomComp;
+dual+accgen+compound:ي+dual			MarkGenComp;

LEXICON FemPlural
+fem+pl:ات				PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON MascPlural
+masc+pl+nom:ون+pl			MarkNom;
+masc+pl+accgen:ين+pl				MarkGen;
+masc+pl+nom+compound:و+pl		MarkNomComp;
+masc+pl+accgen+compound:ي+pl		MarkGenComp;

LEXICON CaseEnds
+sg@U.CMPND.OFF@@U.ART.OFF@:0@U.CMPND.OFF@@U.ART.OFF@	IndefCaseEnds;
+sg:0					PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON CaseEndsPl
@U.CMPND.OFF@@U.ART.OFF@		IndefCaseEnds;
					PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON IndefCaseEnds
+indef+acc:اً+acc				MarkAcc;
					WordEnd;

LEXICON MarkNom
@U.CMPND.OFF@@U.CASE.NOM@ 	PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON MarkNomComp
@U.CASE.NOM@			PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON MarkAcc
@U.CMPND.OFF@@U.CASE.ACC@	PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON MarkGenComp
@U.CASE.GEN@			PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON MarkGen
@U.CMPND.OFF@@U.CASE.GEN@	PreCompoundPronoun;

LEXICON PreCompoundPronoun
+token					CompoundPronoun;
					WordEnd;


LEXICON CompoundPronoun
! clitic objects
!1pers
! ـي+genpron+1pers+sg@R.VERBAL.ON@:ـني@R.VERBAL.ON@		MarkCompound;
ـي+genpron+1pers+sg@U.VERBAL.OFF@:ـي@U.VERBAL.OFF@		MarkCompound;
ـنا+genpron+1pers+:ـنا				MarkCompound;
!2pers
ـك+genpron+2pers+sg+masc:ـك				MarkCompound;
ـك+genpron+2pers+sg+fem:ـك				MarkCompound;
ـكم+genpron+2pers+pl+masc:ـكم				MarkCompound;
ـكن+genpron+2pers+pl+fem:ـكن				MarkCompound;
ـكما+genpron+2pers+dual:ـكما				MarkCompound;
!3pers
ـها+genpron+3pers+sg+fem:ـها				MarkCompound;
ـه+genpron+3pers+sg+masc:ـه				MarkCompound;
ـهما+genpron+3pers+dual:ـهما				MarkCompound;
ـهم+genpron+3pers+pl+masc:ـهم				MarkCompound;
ـهن+genpron+3pers+pl+fem:ـهن				MarkCompound;

LEXICON MarkCompound
@U.CMPND.ON@@U.ART.OFF@		WordEnd;


LEXICON WordEnd
+token					#;

LEXICON Abbreviations
آر.				WordEnd;
آي.				WordEnd;
أس.				WordEnd;
أف.				WordEnd;
أم.				WordEnd;
أن.				WordEnd;
أو.				WordEnd;
أي.				WordEnd;
أيه.				WordEnd;
إتش.				WordEnd;
إس.				WordEnd;
إف.				WordEnd;
إكس.				WordEnd;
إل.				WordEnd;
إلخ.				WordEnd;
إم.				WordEnd;
إن.				WordEnd;
إي.				WordEnd;
إيه.				WordEnd;
اتش.				WordEnd;
اس.				WordEnd;
اكس.				WordEnd;
ال.				WordEnd;
الخ.				WordEnd;
اي.				WordEnd;
بي.				WordEnd;
تي.				WordEnd;
جي.				WordEnd;
دبليو.				WordEnd;
دي.				WordEnd;
زد.				WordEnd;
سي.				WordEnd;
في.				WordEnd;
كي.				WordEnd;
كيو.				WordEnd;
واي.				WordEnd;
يو.				WordEnd;
ا.				WordEnd;
أ.				WordEnd;
إ.				WordEnd;
ب.				WordEnd;
ت.				WordEnd;
ث.				WordEnd;
ج.				WordEnd;
ح.				WordEnd;
خ.				WordEnd;
د.				WordEnd;
ذ.				WordEnd;
ر.				WordEnd;
ز.				WordEnd;
س.				WordEnd;
ش.				WordEnd;
ص.				WordEnd;
ض.				WordEnd;
ط.				WordEnd;
ظ.				WordEnd;
ع.				WordEnd;
غ.				WordEnd;
ف.				WordEnd;
ق.				WordEnd;
ك.				WordEnd;
ل.				WordEnd;
م.				WordEnd;
ن.				WordEnd;
هـ.				WordEnd;
و.				WordEnd;
ي.				WordEnd;
